Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 3
CHARTERING A STATE BANK

11-103-301. Incorporators.

Five or more individual incorporators of a de novo bank or organizers of a converting bank desiring to organize or convert to a state bank must file with the banking board, in triplicate, an application for charter on the form prescribed therefor and together with all other documents required by section 11-103-303, all of which instruments shall be duly signed by each of the incorporators or organizers and sworn to before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to administer oaths. A majority of the incorporators must be residents of the state and citizens of the United States. Each incorporator of a de novo bank shall, prior to the filing of said application, subscribe and pay in full in cash for stock having a par value of not less than one percent of the minimum capital and paid-in surplus requirements.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1084, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1477, § 40, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-302. Application fees.

Each application for charter shall be accompanied by a fee established by the banking board pursuant to section 11-102-104 (11). The fee may be refunded to the incorporators if the application for charter is withdrawn prior to the date set for public hearing.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1084, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-303. Application for de novo charter or charter conversion.

After the capital stock has been fully subscribed, the incorporators may apply to the banking board for a de novo bank charter. The incorporators or organizers of the converting bank must submit to the banking board the following:

Its proposed articles of incorporation in duplicate, in such form as the banking board prescribes and as acceptable to the secretary of state for purposes of filing, containing the following information: The name of the state bank; whether the state bank is to exercise trust powers; the community in which it is to be located; the amount of capital, the number of shares of each class, the relative preferences, powers, and the rights of each class, the par value of the shares of each class, and the amount of the paid-in surplus; a statement whether voting for directors is or is not cumulative, and the extent of the preemptive rights of stockholders; and such other proper provisions to govern the business and affairs of the state bank as may be desired by the incorporators or organizers.

An application for a charter in such form and containing such information as the banking board requires, including but not limited to the following: The name, business and residence address, and business and professional affiliations of each director and executive officer; the name, residence, citizenship, and occupation of each subscriber or shareholder and the number of shares for which he or she has subscribed or owns directly or indirectly; the past and present connection with any bank, other than as a customer, on terms generally available to the public of each director and each subscriber or shareholder to more than five percent of the capital stock, including beneficial interests; the amount to be borrowed and from whom borrowed on any stock issued to a subscriber to or shareholder of more than five percent of the capital stock; the address at which the converting bank's main office and existing branches are located or the address at which the de novo state bank proposes to do business or, if such address is not known, the area within a radius of one-half mile in which the proposed bank is to be located and the community that it proposes to serve; a statement that all the proposed bylaws have been attached as an exhibit to the application; and such other information as the banking board may reasonably require to enable it to determine whether a charter should be issued. The proposed bylaws must be attached to the application as an exhibit.

If the proposed articles of incorporation or application do not comply with the requirements of this code, and with the requirements of the banking board issued pursuant thereto, the banking board shall, within thirty days after the receipt thereof, return both of the documents to the incorporators or organizers, calling attention to the defects therein. If such articles of incorporation and application are not so returned by the banking board within thirty days after the receipt thereof, they shall be deemed to have been filed with the banking board as of the date received in its office; otherwise they shall be deemed filed as of the date the amended documents, with all defects corrected, are received in the commissioner's office.

Not more than forty days after the date upon which the completed application for a de novo state bank charter and all required documents are properly filed with the banking board, the banking board shall mail notice of such filing by registered or certified mail to each bank within a three-mile radius of the location of the proposed bank and to such other persons or banks as the banking board may designate. The notice must be in the form prescribed therefor by the banking board and must include a statement that an application for a state banking charter has been filed, the date of the filing, the names and addresses of the incorporators, and the location of the proposed bank. The banking board shall also cause such notice to be published, at least one time, not more than forty days after the date of filing the completed application, in a newspaper of general circulation within the community in which the proposed bank is to be located.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1084, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1478, § 41, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-304. Procedure for granting or denying charter.

Within sixty days following the filing of the completed application for a de novo charter or conversion of an established bank, the commissioner shall make or cause to be made a careful investigation to determine that the following requirements have been met:

That the applicant has proceeded in a lawful manner;

That the name is not deceptively similar to that of another bank or otherwise misleading;

That the persons who will serve as directors or officers, insofar as such persons are known, possess the qualifications and experience required under rules promulgated by the banking board and that the qualifications and financial status of the incorporators, directors, officers, and persons in control of the bank, as defined in section 11-102-302 (2), are consistent with their responsibilities and duties;

That the proposed capital satisfies the standards and guidelines in the rules promulgated by the banking board;

That the proposed or amended articles of incorporation and bylaws are appropriate or may be amended to be appropriate.

If the commissioner determines that any of the requirements in subsection (1) of this section have not been met in any respect, he or she shall notify the applicant of such deficiencies and of corrective measures deemed appropriate. Within six months after the filing of an application for charter, and prior to the hearing prescribed in subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner shall report to the banking board that the applicant has met all of the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, if such be the case, or shall report which requirements have been met and which have not been met, together with the circumstances respecting such deficiencies. This report shall be introduced by the banking board into the record of the hearing on such application.

The banking board, within six months after the filing of an application for charter, and subject to subsection (7) of this section, shall hold a public hearing to consider the application; except that the banking board, for valid reasons and good cause, may postpone such hearing. At such hearing, the applicant for a de novo bank charter has the burden of proving:

That the proposed bank will serve a public need and advantage in the community or area of the community that the bank will serve; and

That the volume of business in the community or area of the community that the proposed bank will serve is such that profitable operation of the bank may be reasonably projected.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the banking board has given notice pursuant to subsection (5) of this section of a hearing on any application for charter filed pursuant to this section and the banking board has received no written protests against such charter application on or before the tenth day preceding the date fixed for the hearing, the banking board may grant such charter without a hearing as otherwise required in this section if the applicants for such charter are known to the banking board.

On hearing, the banking board may admit in evidence the application for charter and any other relevant information in the files of the division. The applicant and all others receiving notice by registered or certified mail under subsection (5) of this section are also entitled to be heard and to introduce testimony at such hearing, as well as such others as the banking board may determine to be necessary.

The banking board shall give notice of the hearing on application for a de novo bank charter provided in subsection (3) of this section at least thirty days in advance of the hearing date fixed by the banking board, by registered or certified mail, to the applicant, to each bank within a three-mile radius of the location of the proposed bank, and to such other persons or banks as the banking board may designate. The notice must be in the form prescribed by the banking board and must include the names of the incorporators, the name of each stockholder subscribing to ten percent or more of the stock of the bank, the name and location of the proposed bank, the date, time, and place of the hearing, and a statement declaring that the application and proposed articles of incorporation or amended articles of incorporation are available for inspection in the office of the banking board. The banking board shall also cause such notice to be published at least one time not less than twenty days prior to the date fixed for such hearing in a newspaper of general circulation within the community in which the proposed bank is to be located.

Within one hundred twenty days following the date of conclusion of the hearing, the banking board shall issue a written order requiring the commissioner to grant a charter if a majority of the banking board finds that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section have been met and that the applicant for a de novo bank charter has met the burden of proof prescribed in subsection (3) of this section. The banking board shall make execution of its order to grant a de novo bank charter contingent upon the proposed bank making a bona fide application for membership in the federal deposit insurance corporation or the federal reserve system. In applications where the directors or management has not been fully disclosed at the time of the hearing, the banking board may make execution of its order to grant a charter contingent upon its subsequent approval of the directors and management. If a majority of the banking board finds that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or the burden of proof of subsection (3) of this section have not been met, the banking board shall deny the application for a de novo charter. The banking board may revoke a charter in any case where the proposed bank has not exercised its charter and opened for business within six months after the date of the order to grant the charter.

If, within a ninety-day period, there have been filed with the banking board two or more applications for a de novo bank charter for state banks to serve the same community, the banking board may hold a single hearing to consider the applications. The banking board may grant or deny a de novo bank charter to one or more of the applicants without regard to the priority in time of filing applications. The determination of the banking board to deny a charter to an applicant who might otherwise qualify for a charter under subsections (1) and (3) of this section must be based upon a finding that the public need or advantage of the community or area of the community in which the proposed bank will be located will best be served by such denial and by the granting of a de novo bank charter on another application or other applications heard at such single hearing.

It is a criminal offense under this code for a proposed de novo state bank to perform any act as a state bank other than to perfect its organization, obtain and equip a place of business, or otherwise prepare to do business as a state bank prior to receiving a charter.

Unless otherwise provided by law to the contrary, the banking board must first approve the articles of incorporation, amended articles of incorporation, or amendments to articles of incorporation, which the applicant shall then deliver and file as follows:

Duplicate originals shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with the general corporate laws of this state;

A verified copy shall be filed in the office of the clerk and recorder for the county in which the state bank is located;

A copy to which the commissioner shall affix the charter, or certificate of approval in the case of amendments, shall be delivered by the commissioner to the applicant.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1085, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

IP(1), IP(3)(a), (5), (6), (7), (8), and IP(9) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1479, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-110 as it existed prior to 2003.